Utah statutes.
62A-4a-205.5.   Prohibition of discrimination based on race, ethnicity, and
cultural heritage.
With regard to children in the custody of the division who have permanency
goals of adoption or for whom a final plan for pursuing termination of
parental rights has been approved in accordance with Section 78A-6-314, the
division may not base its decision for placement of those children solely on
the race, ethnicity, or cultural heritage of either the child or the
prospective adoptive parents.  The basis of a decision for placement shall be
the best interest of the child.
